Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 50 Rare Diseases

Effective date.

This chapter became effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

The National Institutes of Health sponsors the Genetic and Rare Diseases Information Center. For further details on this Center, please visit: https://www.rarediseases.info.nih.gov/.

The former chapter, consisting of Code Sections 31-50-1 through 31-50-5, and relating to the Commission on Medical Cannabis, was repealed and reserved by Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 3-1/HB 1, effective June 30, 2016. The former chapter was based on Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 3-1/HB 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 31/HB 737.

31-50-1.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

A rare disease, sometimes called an orphan disease, is defined as a disease that affects fewer than 200,000 people in the United States;

There are more than 7,000 known rare diseases affecting approximately 25-30 million Americans, more than half of which are children;

More than 90 percent of rare diseases do not have a federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approved treatment;

While the exact cause of many rare diseases remains unknown, many rare diseases are genetic in origin and can be linked to mutations in a single gene, or in multiple genes, which can be passed down from generation to generation;

People with rare diseases face many challenges, including delays in obtaining an accurate diagnosis, finding a health care provider with expertise in their condition, and a lack of affordable access to therapies and medications used to treat rare diseases; and

A state based advisory council composed of qualified professionals and persons living with rare diseases and their caregivers could educate medical professionals, government agencies, legislators, and the public about rare diseases as an important public health issue and encourage research into the development of new ways to diagnose and treat rare diseases.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-50-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 250, § 1/HB 918.

31-50-2.
Rare Disease Advisory Council established; membership; compensation.

There is hereby established the Georgia Rare Disease Advisory Council within the department.

The advisory council shall be composed of 16 members as follows:

The following members appointed by the Governor:

A chairperson, who shall not be a state employee;

One representative from an academic research institution in the state that receives grant funding for rare disease research;

One representative from the Division of Medical Assistance Plans of the Department of Community Health;

One representative from the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services;

One representative from the Department of Public Health; and

One geneticist licensed and practicing in Georgia;

The following members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives:

One registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed and practicing in Georgia with experience treating rare diseases;

One physician practicing in Georgia with experience treating rare diseases;

One pediatric specialist trained in the care of children with rare disease;

One patient who has a rare disease; and

One caregiver of a person with a rare disease; and

The following members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor:

One patient who has a rare disease;

One representative of a rare disease patient organization that operates in Georgia;

One representative from the biopharma industry;

One representative from a health plan company; and

One licensed social worker practicing in Georgia with experience working with rare disease patients.

All members of the advisory council shall be full-time residents of Georgia.

The advisory council shall meet upon the call of the chairperson and shall meet no less than quarterly, either in person or via virtual means. The advisory council shall provide opportunities for the public to provide input.

Members of the advisory council shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be allowed actual and necessary expenses in the performance of their duties. Any legislative members of the advisory council shall receive the allowances provided for in Code Section 28-1-8. Citizen members shall receive a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21, as well as the mileage or transportation allowance authorized for state employees. Members who are state officials or state employees shall receive no compensation for their services on the advisory council but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the advisory council in the same manner as reimbursements are made in their capacity as state officials or state employees. The funds necessary for the reimbursement of the expenses of state officials, other than legislative members, and state employees shall come from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to their respective departments.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-50-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 250, § 1/HB 918.

31-50-3.
Purpose; required activities; funding.

The purpose of the advisory council shall be to advise the General Assembly and other state agencies and departments, as appropriate, on the needs of individuals with rare diseases living in Georgia.

The advisory council shall conduct the following activities to benefit rare disease patients in Georgia:

Convene public hearings, make inquiries, and solicit comments from the general public in Georgia to assist the advisory council with a first-year landscape or survey of the needs of rare disease patients, caregivers, and providers in the state;

Consult with health care experts to develop policy recommendations to improve patient access to quality rare disease specialists, affordable and comprehensive health care coverage, better access to clinical trials, expansion of telehealth services, relevant diagnostics, timely treatment and to make recommendations to state agencies and insurers that provide services to persons with a rare disease on the impact of prior authorization, cost-sharing, tiering, or other utilization management procedures on the provision of treatment and care for patients;

Advise the Department of Community Health with respect to state health plans, including Medicaid, PeachCare for Kids, and the state health benefit plan, in their review of products or medications for the treatment of rare and orphan diseases and drugs or biological products within the emerging fields of personalized medicine and gene-editing therapeutics. The Department of Community Health shall seek input of the advisory council regarding rare diseases and personalized medicine to address topics including, but not limited to, the impact of coverage, cost-sharing, tiering, and utilization management on access to rare disease therapies;

Make recommendations to the Newborn Screening and Genetics Advisory Committee established pursuant to subsection (i) of Code Section 31-12-6 as it relates to rare diseases;

Publish on the advisory council’s website a list of existing, publicly accessible resources on research, diagnosis, treatment, and educational materials for health care providers relating to the rare diseases in Georgia; and

Research and identify best practices to reduce health disparities and achieve health equity in the research, diagnosis, and treatment of rare diseases in Georgia.

The advisory council may solicit and accept donations, gifts, grants, property, or matching funds from any public or private source for the use by the council in conducting the activities required pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-50-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 250, § 1/HB 918.

31-50-4.
Annual reporting.

No later than June 30, 2023, and annually thereafter, the advisory council shall submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly. Such annual report shall:

Detail the activities and progress of the advisory council in the prior year;

Provide an update on the status of funding of the advisory council, including any grant funds which were solicited, accepted, or used, and any remaining balances; and

Provide recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly on ways to address the needs of people living with rare diseases in Georgia.

Prior to submission, a draft of the annual report shall be made available for public comment and discussed at an open public meeting.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-50-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 250, § 1/HB 918.